Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.070

Findings and conclusions, how made.

In any case tried upon the facts without a jury or with an advisory jury, any party may, when the evidence is closed, submit distinct and concise proposed findings of fact and conclusions of law. They may be written and handed to the court, or at the option of the court, oral, and entered in the record.

[ 2003 c 406 s 3; Code 1881 s 222; 1877 p 47 s 226; 1869 p 56 s 226; RRS s 341.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 52(a).